Maine, session 132, LD890.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §13786-G is enacted to read:
§13786-G. Dispensing of ivermectin
1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
the following terms have the following meanings.
A. "COVID-19" has the same meaning as in Title 24-A, section 4320-P, subsection 1,
paragraph A.
B. "Standing order" means a written prescription drug order signed by a practitioner
acting within the lawful scope of the practitioner's license that specifies a protocol for
the dispensing of ivermectin under the delegated prescriptive authority of the
practitioner.
2. Dispensing of ivermectin. Upon a patient's request, a pharmacist may dispense
ivermectin to the patient without a prior prescription pursuant to a standing order subject
to the following requirements:
A. The standing order authorizes the dispensing of ivermectin to the patient for the
treatment of COVID-19, influenza or cancer;
B. The standing order specifies a mechanism to document any screening performed on
the patient and to document the prescription in the patient's medical record and includes
a plan for evaluating and treating any adverse event experienced by the patient; and
C. The pharmacist fulfills all documentation and other requirements established by the
board when dispensing ivermectin.
3. Legitimate medical purpose. A pharmacist who dispenses ivermectin under a
standing order is deemed to be dispensing ivermectin for a legitimate medical purpose in
the usual course of the practice of pharmacy.
4. Rules. The board may adopt rules to implement the requirements of this section.
Rules adopted by the board pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.